Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2715
Fees, legacies, devises, distributive shares; payment to claimant; record.

It shall be the duty of the county judge to pay any fees, money, costs, legacies, devises, or sums due creditors, held by him, to the person entitled thereto, upon proof of his identity to the satisfaction of the judge. A plain record shall be kept of all such fees, money, costs, legacies, devises, and money due heirs, creditors, or other persons, paid as aforesaid, and the same shall always be open to the inspection of the public.

Laws 1909, c. 40, § 2, p. 227;

R.S.1913, § 1243;

Laws 1921, c. 105, § 1, p. 376;

C.S.1922, § 1166;

C.S.1929, § 27-546;

R.S.1943, § 24-551;

Laws 1967, c. 139, § 2, p. 426;

R.R.S.1943, § 24-551;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 61;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-561.